dictionaries/lb/index.aff
FLAG long
SFX g0 Y 10
SFX g0 en t/g9** [^djrtwgf]en is:papa
SFX g0 den t/g9** [^d]den is:papa
SFX g0 en t/g9** [^äio]ren is:papa
SFX g0 jen cht/g9** jen is:papa
SFX g0 ren ert/g9** [äio]ren is:papa
SFX g0 en 0/g9** ten is:papa
SFX g0 ügen üügt/g9** ügen is:papa
SFX g0 en t/g9** [^ü]gen is:papa
SFX g0 afen aaft/g9** afen is:papa
SFX g0 en t/g9** [^a]fen is:papa

SFX z3 Y 2
SFX z3 0 järeg/a0 [^n]
SFX z3 n järeg/a0 n

SFX G0 Y 10
SFX G0 en t/G9** [^djrtwgf]en is:papa
SFX G0 den t/G9** [^d]den is:papa
SFX G0 en t/G9** [^äio]ren is:papa
SFX G0 jen cht/G9** jen is:papa
SFX G0 ren ert/G9** [äio]ren is:papa
SFX G0 en 0/G9** ten is:papa
SFX G0 ügen üügt/G9** ügen is:papa
SFX G0 en t/G9** [^ü]gen is:papa
SFX G0 afen aaft/G9** afen is:papa
SFX G0 en t/G9** [^a]fen is:papa

PFX G9 Y 1
PFX G9 0 ge/** .

SFX m1 Y 2
SFX m1 0 en . is:plural
SFX m1 0 ë . is:eifeler is:eifeler_changed_e

SFX m2 Y 2
SFX m2 0 n ie is:plural
SFX m2 0 0 ie is:plural is:eifeler is:eifeler_identical
